Utah statutes.
70A-4a-503.   Injunction or restraining order with respect to funds transfer.

(1)  For proper cause and in compliance with applicable law, a court may restrain:

(a)  a person from issuing a payment order to initiate a funds transfer;

(b)  an originator's bank from executing the payment order of the originator; or

(c)  the beneficiary's bank from releasing funds to the beneficiary or the beneficiary from withdrawing the funds.

(2)  A court may not otherwise restrain a person from issuing a payment order, paying or receiving payment of a payment order, or otherwise acting with respect to a funds transfer.



Enacted by Chapter 294, 1990 General Session

